Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 108. Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers Franchising

§ 4083.
Title of chapter.

This chapter may be known and cited as the “Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers Franchising Practices Act.”

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4084.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the distribution and sale of vehicles within this State vitally affects the general economy of the State and the public interest and the public welfare, and that in order to promote the public interest and the public welfare, and in the exercise of its police power, it is necessary to regulate vehicle manufacturers, distributors, or wholesalers and factory or distributor representatives, and to regulate franchises issued by the aforementioned who are doing business in this State in order to prevent frauds, impositions, and other abuses upon its citizens and to protect and preserve the investments and properties of the citizens of this State.

The Legislature further finds that there continues to exist an inequality of bargaining power between motor vehicle franchisors and motor vehicle franchisees. This inequality of bargaining power enables motor vehicle franchisors to compel motor vehicle franchisees to execute franchises and related agreements that contain terms and conditions that would not routinely be agreed to by the motor vehicle franchisees if this inequality did not exist. Furthermore, as the result of the inequality of bargaining power, motor vehicle franchisees have not had the opportunity to have disputes with their motor vehicle franchisors arising out of the franchisor-franchisee relationship heard in an appropriate venue, convenient to both parties, by tribunals established by statute for the resolution of these disputes. It therefore is in the public interest to enact legislation to prevent unfair or arbitrary treatment of motor vehicle franchisees by motor vehicle franchisors. It is the Legislature’s intent to have this chapter liberally construed in order to achieve its purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4085.
Definitions.

The following words, terms, and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Board” means the Transportation Board as established in

19 V.S.A. § 3

.

“Coerce” means the failure to act in a fair and equitable manner in performing or complying with any terms or provisions of a franchise or agreement; provided, however, that recommendation, persuasion, urging, or argument shall not be synonymous with coerce or lack of good faith.

“Dealership facilities” means the real estate, buildings, fixtures, and improvements that have been devoted to the conduct of business under the franchise by the new motor vehicle dealer.

“Designated family member” means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of the owner of a new motor vehicle dealer who, in the case of the owner’s death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in the new motor vehicle dealer under the terms of the owner’s will, or who has been nominated in any other written instrument, or who, in the case of an incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealer, has been appointed by a court as the legal representative of the new motor vehicle dealer’s property.

“Established place of business” means a permanent, commercial building located within this State easily accessible and open to the public at all reasonable times and at which the business of a new motor vehicle dealer, including the display and repair of vehicles, may be lawfully carried on in accordance with the terms of all applicable building codes, zoning, and other land-use regulatory ordinances.

“Franchise” means all agreements and contracts between any new motor vehicle manufacturer, written or otherwise, and any new motor vehicle dealer that relate to the operation of the franchise and purport to fix the legal rights and liabilities of the parties to such agreements or contracts, including agreements pursuant to which the dealer purchases and resells the franchise product, performs warranty and other service on the manufacturer’s products, leases or rents the dealership premises or agreements concerning the dealership premises, or construction or renovation of the dealership premises.

“Franchisee” means a new motor vehicle dealer who enters into or is currently a party to a franchise with a franchisor.

“Franchisor” means any manufacturer, distributor, distributor branch or factory branch, importer, or other person, partnership, corporation, association, or entity, whether resident or nonresident, that enters into or is currently a party to a franchise with a new motor vehicle dealer.

“Fraud” means, in addition to its common law connotation, the misrepresentation, in any manner, of a material fact; a promise or representation not made honestly and in good faith; and the intentional failure to disclose a material fact.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact and the observation of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade as defined and interpreted in 9A V.S.A. § 1-201(b)(20) of the Uniform Commercial Code.

“Line-make” means motor vehicles that are offered for sale, lease, or distribution under a common name, trademark, service mark, or brand name of the franchisor or manufacturer of the motor vehicle.

“Manufacturer” means any person, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles, or imports for distribution through distributors of motor vehicles, or any partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, that is controlled by the manufacturer.
(10) (A) “Manufacturer” means any person, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles, or imports for distribution through distributors of motor vehicles, or any partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, that is controlled by the manufacturer.

Additionally, the term manufacturer shall include the following terms:

“Distributor” means any person, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle to new motor vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives or who controls any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle to new motor vehicle dealers.

“Factory branch” means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer for the purpose of selling, or offering for sale, vehicles to a distributor or new motor vehicle dealer, or for directing or supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways that is self-propelled, not including farm tractors and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products.

“New motor vehicle” means a vehicle that has been sold to a new motor vehicle dealer and that has not been used for other than demonstration purposes and on which the original title has not been issued from the new motor vehicle dealer.

“New motor vehicle dealer” means any person who holds, or held at the time a cause of action under this chapter accrued, a valid sales and service agreement, franchise, or contract granted by the manufacturer or distributor for the retail sale of the manufacturer’s or distributor’s new motor vehicles, is not affiliated by ownership or control with a franchisor, and is engaged in the business of any of the following with respect to new motor vehicles or the parts and accessories for those new motor vehicles:

selling or leasing;

offering to sell or lease;

soliciting or advertising the sale or lease; or

offering through a subscription or like agreement.

“Owner” means any person holding an ownership interest in the business entity operating as a new motor vehicle dealer or under a franchise as defined in this chapter either as a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal entity. To the extent that the rights of any owner under this chapter conflict with the rights of any other owner, such rights shall accrue in priority order based on the percentage of ownership interest held by each owner, with the owner having the greatest ownership interest having first priority and succeeding priority accruing to other owners in the descending order of percentage of ownership interest.

“Person” means every natural person, partnership, corporation, association, trust, estate, or any other legal entity.

“Relevant market area” means the area within a radius of 25 miles around an existing dealer or the area of responsibility defined in the franchise, whichever is greater; except that, where a manufacturer is seeking to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealer and there are one or more existing new motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make within a 10-mile radius of the proposed dealer site, the “relevant market area” shall in all instances be the area within a radius of 10 miles around an existing dealer.

“Motor home” means a motor vehicle that is primarily designed to provide temporary living quarters, built into as an integral part of, or permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or van. The vehicle must contain at least four of the following facilities: cooking; refrigeration or ice box; self-contained toilet; heating or air conditioning, or both; a potable water supply system, including a sink and faucet; separate 110-125 volt electrical power supply or an LP gas supply, or both.

“Non-franchised zero-emission vehicle manufacturer” means a manufacturer that:

only manufacturers zero-emission vehicles, including plug-in electric vehicles as defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4(85)

;

only sells or leases directly to consumers new or used zero-emission vehicles that it manufactures or vehicles that have been traded in in conjunction with a new zero-emission vehicle sale;

does not currently sell or lease, and has never sold or leased, motor vehicles in Vermont through a franchisee;

has not sold or transferred a combined direct or indirect ownership interest of greater than 30 percent in such non-franchised zero-emission vehicle manufacturer to a franchisor, subsidiary, or other entity controlled by a franchisor or has not acquired a combined direct or indirect ownership interest of greater than 30 percent in a franchisor, subsidiary, or other entity controlled by a franchisor; and

is a dealer registered pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 4.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 63

, §§ 1, 2, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 4086.
Warranty and predelivery obligations to new motor vehicle dealers.

Each new motor vehicle manufacturer shall specify in writing to each of its new motor vehicle dealers licensed in this State the dealer’s obligations for predelivery preparation and warranty service on its products, shall compensate the new motor vehicle dealer for such service required of the dealer by the manufacturer, and shall provide the dealer the schedule of compensation to be paid the dealer for parts, work, and service in connection therewith, and the time allowance for the performance of the work and service.

A schedule of compensation shall not fail to include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work as well as for repair service and labor. Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of predelivery and warranty service shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed. The hourly rate paid to a new motor vehicle dealer shall not be less than the rate charged by the dealer to customers for nonwarranty service and repairs. Each manufacturer shall compensate each of its dealers for parts used to fulfill warranty, predelivery, and recall obligations of repair and servicing at amounts not less than the retail amounts customarily charged by the dealer to its retail customers for like parts for nonwarranty work. The amounts established by a dealer to its retail customers for labor and like parts for nonwarranty work are deemed to be fair and reasonable compensation; provided, however, a manufacturer may rebut such a presumption by showing that such amount so established is unfair and unreasonable in light of the practices of at least four other franchised motor vehicle dealers in the vicinity offering the same line-make or a similar competitive line-make. A manufacturer may not otherwise recover all or any portion of its costs for compensating its motor vehicle dealers licensed in this State for warranty parts and service either by reduction in the amount due to the dealer or by separate charge, surcharge, or other imposition.

For purposes of this section, the “retail amounts customarily charged” by the franchisee for parts may be established by submitting to the manufacturer 100 sequential nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders or 60 days of nonwarranty customer-paid service repair orders, whichever is less in terms of total cost, covering repairs made no more than 180 days before the submission and declaring the average percentage markup. The average percentage markup so declared is the retail amount, which goes into effect 30 days following the declaration, subject to audit of the submitted repair orders by the manufacturer and adjustment of the average percentage markup based on that audit. Only retail sales not involving warranty repairs, not involving state inspection, not involving routine maintenance such as changing the oil and oil filter, and not involving accessories may be considered in calculating the average percentage markup. A manufacturer may not require a new motor vehicle dealer to establish the average percentage markup by an unduly burdensome or time-consuming method or by requiring information that is unduly burdensome or time-consuming to provide, including part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations. A new motor vehicle dealer may not change the average percentage markup more than two times in one calendar year. Further, the manufacturer shall reimburse the new motor vehicle dealer for any labor performed at the retail rate customarily charged by that franchisee for the same labor when not performed in satisfaction of a warranty, provided the franchisee’s rate for labor not performed in satisfaction of a warranty is routinely posted in a place conspicuous to its service customer.

It is a violation of this section for any new motor vehicle manufacturer to fail to perform any warranty obligations or to fail to include in written notices of factory recalls to new motor vehicle owners and dealers the expected date by which necessary parts and equipment will be available to dealers for the correction of such defects, or to fail to compensate any of the new motor vehicle dealers in this State for repairs effected by a recall.

All claims made by new motor vehicle dealers pursuant to this section for labor and parts shall be paid within 45 days following their approval; provided, however, that the manufacturer retains the right to audit the claims and to charge back the dealer for fraudulent claims for a period of two years following payment. All claims shall be either approved or disapproved within 45 days after their receipt on forms and in the manner specified by the manufacturer, and any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within 45 days after the receipt shall be construed to be approved and payment must follow within 45 days. No claim that has been approved and paid may be charged back to the dealer unless it can be shown that the claim was false or fraudulent, that the repairs were not made properly or were unnecessary to correct the defective condition, or that the dealer failed to reasonably substantiate the claim either in accordance with the manufacturer’s reasonable written procedures or by other reasonable means.

A manufacturer shall retain the right to audit warranty claims for a period of one year after the date on which the claim is paid.

A manufacturer shall retain the right to audit all incentive and reimbursement programs and charge back any amounts paid on claims that are false or unsubstantiated for a period of 18 months from the date on which the claim is paid or one year from the end of a program that gave rise to the payment, whichever is later.

Any chargeback resulting from any audit shall not be made until a final order is issued by the Transportation Board if a protest to the proposed chargeback is filed within 30 days of the notification of the final amount claimed by the manufacturer, to be due after exhausting any procedure established by the manufacturer to contest the chargeback, other than arbitration. The manufacturer has the burden of proof in any proceeding filed at the Board under this section.

It is unlawful for a franchisor, manufacturer, factory branch, distributor branch, or subsidiary to own, operate, or control, either directly or indirectly, a motor vehicle warranty or service facility located in the State except:

on an emergency or interim basis;

if no qualified applicant has applied for appointment as a dealer in a market previously served by a new motor vehicle dealer of that manufacturer’s line-make; or

if the manufacturer is a non-franchised zero-emission vehicle manufacturer that directly owns, operates, and controls the warranty or service facility.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

1989, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.);

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 63

, § 3, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 4087.
Transportation damages.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, the manufacturer is liable for all damages to motor vehicles before delivery to a carrier or transporter.

If a new motor vehicle dealer determines the method of transportation, the risk of loss passes to the dealer upon delivery of the vehicle to the carrier.

In every other instance, the risk of loss remains with the manufacturer until such time as the new motor vehicle dealer or his or her designee accepts the vehicle from the carrier.

On any new motor vehicle, a manufacturer or distributor shall disclose in writing to a dealer and a dealer shall disclose in writing to the ultimate purchaser any uncorrected damage or any corrected damage to the vehicle, as measured by retail repair costs, if the corrected damage exceeds the following percentage of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §§ 1231-1233:
(d) (1) On any new motor vehicle, a manufacturer or distributor shall disclose in writing to a dealer and a dealer shall disclose in writing to the ultimate purchaser any uncorrected damage or any corrected damage to the vehicle, as measured by retail repair costs, if the corrected damage exceeds the following percentage of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §§ 1231-1233:

five percent up to the first $10,000.00; and

two percent on any amount over $10,000.00.

Damage to glass, tires, wheels, and bumpers shall be excluded from the calculation required in this subsection when replaced by identical manufacturer’s original equipment.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

1989, No. 31

;

1989, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 23, 1990;

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 4088.
Product liability indemnification.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, it shall be a violation of this law for any new motor vehicle manufacturer to fail to indemnify and hold harmless its franchised dealers against any judgment or settlement for damages, after reasonable notice of the proposed settlement to the manufacturer, including court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees of the new motor vehicle dealer, arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits including strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, warranty (express or implied), or rescission of the sale as is defined in 9A V.S.A. § 2—608 of the Uniform Commercial Code, to the extent that the judgment or settlement relates to the alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly, or design of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories or other functions by the manufacturer, beyond the control of the dealer.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982.

§ 4089.
Termination; cancellation or nonrenewal.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise or notwithstanding the terms or provisions of any waiver, no manufacturer shall cancel, terminate, or fail to renew any franchise with a licensed new motor vehicle dealer unless:

the manufacturer:

has satisfied the notice requirement of section 4090 of this title;

has good cause for cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal; and

has acted in good faith as defined in this chapter; and

the Transportation Board finds after a hearing that the manufacturer has acted in good faith and there is good cause for cancellation, termination, failure to renew, or refusal to continue any franchise relationship, consistent with the following:
(2) (A) the Transportation Board finds after a hearing that the manufacturer has acted in good faith and there is good cause for cancellation, termination, failure to renew, or refusal to continue any franchise relationship, consistent with the following:

the new motor vehicle dealer may file a protest with the Board within 45 days after receiving the 90-day notice;

a copy of the protest shall be served by the new motor vehicle dealer on the manufacturer;

when a protest is filed to challenge the cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal of a franchise agreement under this section, such franchise agreement shall remain in full force and effect, and such franchisee shall retain all rights and remedies pursuant to the terms and conditions of such franchise agreement, including the right to sell or transfer such franchisee’s ownership interest until a final determination by the Board and any appeal;

the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof has received the written consent of the new motor vehicle dealer; or

the appropriate period for filing a protest has expired.

For purposes of this chapter, good cause for terminating, canceling, or failing to renew a franchise shall be limited to failure by the franchisee to substantially comply with those requirements imposed upon the franchisee by the franchise as set forth in subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise or the terms or provisions of any waiver, good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal when:

there is a failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise which provision is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise relationship, provided that compliance on the part of the new motor vehicle dealer is reasonably possible; or if the failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise is pursuant to a notice issued under subdivision 4090(a)(2)(A) of this title; and the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof first acquired actual or constructive knowledge of such failure not more than 180 days prior to the date on which notification is given pursuant to section 4090 of this title;

if the failure by the new motor vehicle dealer, defined in subdivision (1) of this subsection, relates to the performance of the new motor vehicle dealer in sales or service, then good cause shall be defined as the failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with reasonable performance criteria established by the manufacturer if the new motor vehicle dealer was apprised by the manufacturer in writing of such failure; and

the notification stated that notice was provided for failure of performance pursuant to this section;

the new motor vehicle dealer was afforded a reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than six months, to comply with such criteria;

the new motor vehicle dealer did not demonstrate substantial progress towards compliance with the manufacturer’s performance criteria during such period and the new motor vehicle dealer’s failure was not primarily due to economic or market factors within the dealer’s relevant market area beyond the dealer’s control; and

the performance criteria established by the manufacturer are fair, reasonable, and equitable as applied to all same line-make franchisees of the manufacturer in the State.

The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof under this section for showing that it has acted in good faith, that all notice requirements have been satisfied, and that there was good cause for the franchise termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or noncontinuance.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, or the terms or provisions of any waiver, the following do not constitute good cause for the termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or noncontinuance of a franchise:

The change of ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer’s dealership, excluding any change in ownership that would have the effect of the sale of the franchise without the reasonable consent of the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof.

The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer refused to purchase or accept delivery of any new motor vehicle parts, accessories, or any other commodity or services not ordered by the new motor vehicle dealer.

The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the management of, or holds a license for the sale of another line-make of new motor vehicle, or that the new motor vehicle dealer has established another line-make of new motor vehicle in the same dealership facilities as those of the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof, provided that the new motor vehicle dealer maintains a reasonable line of credit for each line-make of new motor vehicle and that the new motor vehicle dealer remains in substantial compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements of the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof.

The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer sells or transfers ownership of the dealership or sells or transfers capital stock in the dealership to the new motor vehicle dealer’s spouse, son, or daughter. The manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof shall give effect to such change in ownership unless the transfer of the new motor vehicle dealer’s license is denied or the new owner is unable to license, as the case may be.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 20

, § 36.

§ 4090.
Notification of termination; cancellation and nonrenewal.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise prior to the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise, the manufacturer shall furnish notification of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal to the new motor vehicle dealer as follows:

in the manner described in subsection (b) of this section; and

not less than 90 days prior to the effective date of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, except as follows:

not less than 15 days prior to the effective date of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal that occurs as a result of:

insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer, or filing of any petition by or against the new motor vehicle dealer under any bankruptcy or receivership law;

failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer;

conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer, or any owner or operator thereof, of any crime that is punishable by imprisonment; or

revocation of any license that the new motor vehicle dealer is required to have to operate a dealership;

not less than 180 days prior to the effective date of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal that occurs as a result of:

any change in ownership, operation, or control of all or any part of the business of the manufacturer, whether by sale or transfer of assets, corporate stock, or other equity interest, assignment, merger, consolidation, combination, joint venture, redemption, operation of law, or otherwise;

the termination, suspension, or cessation of a part or all of the business operations of the manufacturer; or

discontinuance of the sale of the product line or a change in distribution system by the manufacturer, whether through a change in distributors or through the manufacturer’s decision to cease conducting business through a distributor altogether;

not less than 15 days prior to the effective date of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal that occurs as a result of:

insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer, or filing of any petition by or against the new motor vehicle dealer under any bankruptcy or receivership law;

failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer;

conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer, or any owner or operator thereof, of any crime that is punishable by imprisonment; or

revocation of any license that the new motor vehicle dealer is required to have to operate a dealership;

not less than 180 days prior to the effective date of such termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal that occurs as a result of:

any change in ownership, operation, or control of all or any part of the business of the manufacturer, whether by sale or transfer of assets, corporate stock, or other equity interest, assignment, merger, consolidation, combination, joint venture, redemption, operation of law, or otherwise;

the termination, suspension, or cessation of a part or all of the business operations of the manufacturer; or

discontinuance of the sale of the product line or a change in distribution system by the manufacturer, whether through a change in distributors or through the manufacturer’s decision to cease conducting business through a distributor altogether.

Notification under this section shall be in writing; shall be by certified mail or personally delivered to the new motor vehicle dealer; and shall contain:

a statement of intention to terminate, cancel, or not to renew the franchise;

a statement of the reasons for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and

the date on which the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal takes effect.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 20

, § 37.

§ 4091.
Payments.

Within 90 days of the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of any franchise by the manufacturer, pursuant to section 4089 or subdivision 4090(a)(2)(B) of this title or to the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of a franchise by the franchisee, the new motor vehicle dealer shall be paid by the manufacturer for the:

dealer cost plus any charges by the manufacturer thereof for distribution, delivery, and taxes paid by the dealer, less all allowances paid to the dealer by the manufacturer for all new and undamaged motor vehicle inventory purchased from the manufacturer or distributor or from another new motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make in the ordinary course of business if the vehicles have 500 miles or less on the odometer, or in the case of a motor home if the vehicle’s odometer has no more than 1,000 miles above the original factory to dealership delivery mileage, and:

were purchased within the previous 12 months; or

are of the current model year or one-year-prior model year. A motor vehicle shall be “undamaged” under this subsection (a) if any corrected damage to the vehicle does not exceed the amounts set forth in subsection 4087(d) of this title;

dealer cost of each new, unused, undamaged, and unsold part or accessory if such part or accessory is in the current parts catalogue and is still in the original, resaleable merchandising package and acquired from the manufacturer or distributor or from another new motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make in the ordinary course of business;

fair market value of all special tools owned by the dealer that were recommended in writing and designated as special tools and equipment by the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof and purchased from or at the request of the manufacturer or distributor, if the tools and equipment are in usable and good condition, normal wear and tear excepted;

fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the dealer that bears a trademark, trade name, or commercial symbol used or claimed by the manufacturer if the sign was purchased from or at the request of the manufacturer, distributor, or branch or division thereof;

cost of transporting, handling, packing, and loading of motor vehicles, parts, signs, and special tools, subject to repurchase by the manufacturer.

In addition to the other payments set forth in this section, if a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is premised upon any of the occurrences set forth in subdivision 4090(a)(2)(B) of this title, then the manufacturer shall be liable to the dealer for an amount equivalent to the fair market value of the motor vehicle franchise on the day before the date the franchisor announces the action that results in termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

Payment is contingent on the new motor vehicle dealer having clear title to the inventory and other items and having the ability to convey the title to the manufacturer, excepting any liens or encumbrances on the inventory and other items that will be released when the manufacturer pays the new motor vehicle dealer and lien holder for the inventory and other items.

The manufacturer may avoid paying fair market value of the motor vehicle franchise to the dealer under subsection (b) of this section if the franchisor, or another motor vehicle franchisor pursuant to an agreement with the franchisor, offers the franchisee a replacement motor vehicle franchise substantially similar to the existing motor vehicle franchise that takes effect no later than the date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of the franchisee’s existing motor vehicle franchise.

This section shall not apply to a nonrenewal or termination that is implemented as a result of the sale of the assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealer, unless the franchisor and franchisee otherwise agree in writing.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 20

, § 38.

§ 4092.
Dealership facilities assistance upon termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

In the event of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal under this chapter; and

the new motor vehicle dealer is leasing the dealership facilities from a lessor other than the manufacturer, the manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer a sum equivalent to the rent for the unexpired term of the lease or one year’s rent, whichever is less;

if the new motor vehicle dealer owns the dealership facilities, the manufacturer shall pay the new motor vehicle dealer a sum equivalent to the reasonable rental value of the dealership facilities for one year.

If the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is pursuant to subdivision 4090(a)(2)(B) of this title, then, with respect to such facilities as were required as a condition of the franchise and used to conduct sales and service operations related to the franchise product, the manufacturer or distributor shall, in addition to the relief described in subsection (a) of this section:

assume the obligations for any lease of the dealership facilities for the unexpired term of the lease or three years’ rent, whichever is less;

arrange for a new lease of any dealership facilities; or

negotiate a lease termination for the dealership facilities at the manufacturer’s expense.

If, in an action for damages under this section, the manufacturer or distributor fails to prove either that the manufacturer or distributor has acted in good faith or that there was good cause for the franchise termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, then the court, agency, or commission shall order, in addition to any other damages under this section, that the manufacturer or distributor pay the new motor vehicle dealer an amount equal to the value of the dealership as an ongoing business location.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009;

2021, No. 20

, § 39.

§ 4093.
Right of designated family member to succeed in ownership.

Any owner of a new motor vehicle dealer may appoint by will, or any other written instrument, a designated family member to succeed in the ownership interest of the new motor vehicle dealer.

Unless there exists good cause for refusal to honor succession on the part of the manufacturer or distributor, any designated family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealer may succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer under the existing franchise, provided that:

the designated family member gives the manufacturer or distributor written notice of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer within 120 days of the owner’s death or incapacity; and

the designated family member agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise.

The manufacturer or distributor may request, and the designated family member shall provide promptly upon said request, personal and financial data that are reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 14, 1982; amended

2009, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2009.